South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3361.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-7-409. No county may appropriate funds for circuit solicitor operations in a fiscal year below the amount it funded in the immediate previous fiscal year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to Fiscal Year 2025-2026. ----XX----